Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8716
Election to be subject to act; contract; requirements.

(1) A patient safety organization shall contract with providers that elect to be subject to the Patient Safety Improvement Act. The patient safety organization shall establish a formula for determining fees and assessments uniformly within categories of providers.

(2) A provider may elect to be subject to the Patient Safety Improvement Act by contracting with a patient safety organization to make reports as described in the act.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 16.